District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.141

Scope of practice for property managers.

For the purposes of this part, the term “property manager” means an agent for the owner of real estate in all matters pertaining to property management as defined in this subchapter, which are under his or her direction, and who is paid a commission, fee, or other valuable consideration for his or her services. A property manager may employ resident managers. The property manager shall be held accountable for the day-to-day job-related activities of the property manager’s employees. The property manager shall not perform any activities that relate to listing for sale, offering for sale, buying or offering to buy, negotiating the purchase, sale, or exchange of real estate, or negotiating a loan on real estate for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-2201.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.141.